Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.385

Reporting—Actions against agency licensees—Agencies notified of licensing requirement—Posting on website.

For the purposes of reporting actions taken against agency licensees, upon the development of an early learning information system, the following actions shall be posted to the department's website accessible by the public: Suspension, surrender, revocation, denial, stayed suspension, or reinstatement of a license. The department shall also post on the website those agencies subject to licensing that have not initiated the licensing process within thirty days of the department's notification as required in *RCW 43.215.300.

[ 2011 c 296 s 2; 2007 c 415 s 9. Formerly RCW 43.215.370.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.215.300 was recodified as RCW 43.216.325 pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 821, effective July 1, 2018.

Short title—2011 c 296: See note following RCW 43.216.325.